Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-504
Museums; trustees; officers; appointment; meetings; quorum.

The trustees of any city, village, county, or township museum shall immediately after their appointment meet and organize by electing from their number a president, secretary and such other officers as may be necessary. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 4, p. 769;

Laws 1963, c. 306, § 3, p. 904.